Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB953.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. WO1 John Stephen Chrin Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds that:(1) John Stephen Chrin was born June 24, 1949, in Lebanon, Lebanon County.(2) Warrant Officer Chrin graduated from Lebanon Catholic High School in 1967 and eventually attended Mansfield State College.(3) In 1970, during his junior year, Warrant Officer Chrin left Mansfield State College and enlisted in the United States Army on April 28, 1970.(4) In the Army, Warrant Officer Chrin attended Warrant Officer Flight School and became a combat medical evacuation (DUSTOFF) pilot with the rank of Warrant Officer 1.12345678910111213141516171819 (5) Warrant Officer Chrin arrived in Vietnam on July 5, 1971, and was assigned to the 57 Medical Detachment (Helicopter Ambulance) 68 Medical Group (the original DUSTOFF), at Bing Thuy in the Mekong Delta.(6) On October 13, 1971, Warrant Officer Chrin was killed in action while his DUSTOFF 71 was on a MEDVAC mission and crashed during a night DUSTOFF flight in monsoon rains in the Seven Sisters Mountains on the Cambodian border. Five bodies were recovered.(7) At the time of his death, Warrant Officer Chrin had flown more than 125 combat medical evacuation missions through the Delta area of Vietnam.(8) Warrant Officer Chrin and his crew and another 3,200 other DUSTOFF crew members flew more than 490,000 combat medical evacuation missions, rescuing more than 900,000 wounded, at a cost of 216 killed in action and 1,300 wounded.(9) Warrant Officer Chrin was awarded the Purple Heart, six Air medals, a National Defense medal, the Vietnam Service Medal and the Aviator Badge for his meritorious service.(10) Warrant Officer Chrin is memorialized on the Vietnam Veterans War Memorial on panel 2W, line 38.(11) To honor his memory, in 2015, the Mayor of Lebanon proclaimed every October 13 as "John Stephen Chrin Day" in the city.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 22726, carrying Pennsylvania Route 934 over Swatara Creek in East Hanover Township, Lebanon County, is designated the WO1 John Stephen Chrin Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to 20250HB0953PN1020 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0953PN1020 - 3 - 123